Nevada, session 83, AB108.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Outdoor Education and Recreation Grant Program
Account created by NRS 407A.615 for carrying out the Outdoor
Education and Recreation Grant Program created by NRS 407A.605
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $250,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $250,000
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)